Utah statutes.
53A-26a-501.   Unlawful conduct.

"Unlawful conduct" means conduct by any person:

(1)  practicing or engaging in, representing oneself to be practicing or engaging in, or attempting to practice or engage in the profession of a certified interpreter if the person is:

(a)  not certified to do so or exempted from certification under this chapter; or

(b)  restricted from doing so by a restricted, suspended, revoked, temporary, probationary, or inactive certification;

(2)  impersonating another certified interpreter or practicing as a certified interpreter under a false or assumed name, except as permitted by law;

(3)  knowingly employing any other person to practice or engage in or attempt to practice or engage in the profession of a certified interpreter, if the employee is not certified to do so under this chapter;

(4)  knowingly permitting the person's authority to engage in the profession of a certified interpreter to be used by another, except as permitted by law; or

(5)  applying for or obtaining certification or otherwise dealing with the State Board of Education through the use of fraud, forgery, or intentional deception, misrepresentation, misstatement, or omission.



Enacted by Chapter 306, 1994 General Session

